Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,146
Suicide awareness and prevention
training.

(1)
Beginning in school year 2015-16, all public school nurses, teachers, counselors,
school psychologists, administrators, school social workers, and any other
appropriate personnel shall receive at least one hour of suicide awareness
and prevention training each year. This training shall be provided within
the framework of existing inservice training programs offered by the State
Department of Education or as part of required professional development activities.

(2) The department,
in consultation with organizations including, but not limited to, the Nebraska
State Suicide Prevention Coalition, the Nebraska chapter of the American Foundation
for Suicide Prevention, the Behavioral Health Education Center of Nebraska,
the National Alliance on Mental Illness Nebraska, and other organizations
and professionals with expertise in suicide prevention, shall develop a list
of approved training materials to fulfill the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section. Such materials shall include training on how to identify
appropriate mental health services, both within the school and also within
the larger community, and when and how to refer youth and their families to
those services. Such materials may include programs that can be completed
through self-review of suitable suicide prevention materials.

(3) The department
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2014, LB923, § 4.